trunk/apertium-mk-en/apertium-mk-en.mk.dix
<pardef n="изне/се__vblex"> <!-- perf perf"/><s n="iv --> <!-- свършен вид -->
  <e>        <p>          <l>си</l>          <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>сете</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>сам</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>сеш</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>се</l>          <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>семе</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>сете</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>сат</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>сев</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>сеше</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>сеше</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>севме</l>       <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>севте</l>       <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>сеа</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>сел</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>села</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>село</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>селе</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>сов</l>          <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>се</l>           <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>се</l>           <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>совме</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>совте</l>        <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>соа</l>          <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>        <p>          <l>л</l>          <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ла</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ло</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>        <p>          <l>ле</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

 <e>        <p>          <l>сен</l>          <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сениот</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сениов</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сенион</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сена</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сената</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сенава</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сенана</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сено</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сеното</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сеново</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сеноно</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сени</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сените</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сениве</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
 <e>        <p>          <l>сенине</l>         <r>се<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

	<e lm="изнесе"><i>изне</i><par n="изне/се__vblex"/></e>
